Hawaii, session 2026, SB3314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $81,324,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the purpose of capital improvement projects for the sixth senatorial district, as follows: 1.   Kihei Library A.   Plans and design to relocate the library outside the flood zone. Total funding                           $200,000 2.   Kihei Bypass Road A.   Plans for the Kihei bypass from Maui meadows north of Piilani highway to Kulanihakoi high school. Total funding                           $200,000 3.   Kulanihakoi High School A.   ADA-compliant grade-separated crossing. Plans                             $1,000 Land acquisition                  $1,000 Design                            $1,000 Construction                 $19,996,000 Equipment                         $1,000 Total funding                        $20,000,000 B.   Basic kitchen equipment, including a tilt skillet braising system and related items to cook local food and meals. Construction                     $35,000 Total funding                            $35,000 C.   Plans, design, and construction for an athletic complex, including gym, track, football field, and courts. Total funding                            $65,000 4.   Kamalii Elementary School A.   New heating, ventilation, and air conditioning system. Plans                             $1,000 Design                            $1,000 Construction                  $2,497,000 Equipment                         $1,000 Total funding                         $2,500,000 B.   Roofing of building C. Plans                             $1,000 Design                            $1,000 Construction                    $347,000 Equipment                         $1,000 Total funding                           $350,000 5.   Kihei Elementary School A.   Construction and equipment for a special education classroom building. Total funding                        $18,000,000 6.   Rock Wall Repairs and Storm Mitigation A.   Rock wall repairs and storm mitigation at TMK No. 3‑9‑001‑012‑0000. Plan and design                   $1,000 Construction                    $273,000 Total funding                           $274,000 7.   Mauna Kahalawai Watershed Partnership A.   Construction of fencing for approximately 3.4 miles along the conservation district boundary to protect mauka watershed resources from Pohakea gulch through Waikapu valley from the impacts of feral ungulates, including deer and pigs. Total funding                         $2,100,000 8.   Kahoolawe Island Reserve Commission A.   Plans, design, and construction for an educational center exhibition, including updates to community planning and museum exhibition designs, completion of designs and construction drawings, and solicitation of a builder. Plans                           $350,000 Design                        $3,000,000 Construction                    $900,000 Total funding                         $4,250,000 B.   Expansion of the Kihei boathouse, pavilion, and comfort stations. Construction                    $600,000 Total funding                           $600,000 9.   Kihei Boat Ramp A.   Repair of the existing boat ramp and loading docks. Total funding                         $5,500,000 B.   Maintenance dredging of the basin and entrance channel. Total funding                         $3,500,000 10.  Lahaina Small Boat Harbor A.   Relocation of surf stairs to the north side of the harbor channel. Total funding                         $2,500,000 B.   Repair of the seawall at front range light. Total funding                           $500,000 11.  Maalaea Small Boat Harbor A.   Maintenance dredging of the harbor basin and entrance channel. Total funding                         $6,000,000 B.   Replacement of existing docks on the north side of the harbor with a new pile-guided aluminum framed floating marginal wharf, including electrical and water services. Total funding                         $6,500,000 C.   Replacement of existing northwest concrete marginal wharf with a new pile-guided aluminum framed floating marginal wharf, including electrical and water services. Total funding                         $5,500,000 D.   Replacement of existing fenders and tires at the north loading dock with new plastic lumber fenders. Total funding                         $2,500,000 12.  South Maui Mauka High-level Reused Water System A.   Preliminary engineering report for the South Maui mauka high-level reused water system. Total funding                           $250,000 SECTION 2.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 3.  The sums appropriated for the respective capital improvement projects set forth in section 1 shall be expended for the purposes of this Act as follows: (1)  The sum appropriated in item 1 shall be expended by the department of accounting and general services; (2)  The sum appropriated in item 2 shall be expended by the department of transportation; (3)  The sums appropriated in items 3 through 5 shall be expended by the department of education; (4)  The sums appropriated in items 6 through 12 shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________